North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-294.1.
Fees applicable to generators and transporters of hazardous waste, and to hazardous waste storage, treatment, and disposal facilities.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the fee system established by this section is solely to provide funding in addition to federal and State appropriations to support the State’s hazardous waste management program.

Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be used for personnel and other resources necessary to:

Provide a high level of technical assistance and waste minimization effort for the hazardous waste management program.

Provide timely review of permit applications.

Insure that permit decisions are made on a sound technical basis and that permit decisions incorporate all conditions necessary to accomplish the purposes of this Part.

Improve monitoring and compliance of the hazardous waste management program.

Increase the frequency of inspections.

Provide chemical, biological, toxicological, and analytical support for the hazardous waste management program.

Provide resources for emergency response to imminent hazards associated with the hazardous waste management program.

Implement and provide oversight of necessary response activities involving inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal sites.

Provide compliance and prevention activities within the solid waste program to ensure that hazardous waste is not disposed in solid waste management facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.24A, effective July 1, 2014.

The Hazardous Waste Management Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Account and shall be used for the purposes listed in subsection (b).

A person who generates either one kilogram or more of any acute hazardous waste as listed in 40 C.F.R. § 261.30(d) or § 261.33(e) as revised 1 July 1987, or 1000 kilograms or more of hazardous waste, in any calendar month during the year beginning 1 July
and ending 30 June shall pay an annual fee of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400).

A person who generates 100 kilograms or more of hazardous waste in any calendar month during the year beginning 1 July and ending 30 June but less than 1000 kilograms of hazardous waste in each calendar month during that year shall pay an annual fee of
one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175.00).

A person who generates one kilogram or more of acute hazardous waste or 1000 kilograms or more of hazardous waste in any calendar month during the calendar year shall pay, in addition to any fee under subsections (e) and (f) of this section, a tonnage
fee of seventy cents ($0.70) per ton or any part thereof of hazardous waste generated during that year up to a maximum of 25,000 tons.

A person who generates less than one kilogram of acute hazardous waste and less than 100 kilograms of hazardous waste in each calendar month during the year beginning 1 July and ending 30 June shall not be liable for payment of a fee under subsections
(e) and (f) of this section for that year.

Hazardous waste generated as a result of any type of remedial action or by collection by a local government of hazardous waste from households shall not be subject to a tonnage fee under subsections (g) and (l) of this section.

A person who transports hazardous waste shall pay an annual fee of eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00).

A storage, treatment, or disposal facility shall pay an annual activity fee of one thousand six hundred eighty dollars ($1,680) for each activity.

A commercial hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility shall pay annually, in addition to the fees applicable to all hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facilities, a single tonnage charge of two dollars and forty-five cents
($2.45) per ton or any part thereof of hazardous waste stored, treated, or disposed of at the facility. A manufacturing facility that receives hazardous waste generated from the use of a product typical of its manufacturing process
for the purpose of recycling is exempt from this tonnage charge. A facility must have a permit issued under this Article which includes the recycling activity and specifies the type and amount of waste allowed to be received from
off-site for recycling.

An applicant for a permit for a hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility that proposes to operate as a commercial facility shall pay an application fee for each proposed activity as follows:

Storage facility $14,000. (2) Treatment facility $21,000. (3) Disposal facility $35,000.

Click to view

The Commission may adopt rules setting fees for modifications to permits. Such fees shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the application fee.

Annual fees established under this section are due no later than 31 July for the fiscal year beginning 1 July in the same year. Tonnage fees established under this section are due no later than 31 July for the previous calendar year.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(c), effective August 1, 2012.

History.
1987, c. 773, ss. 2, 4-8; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1020, s. 2; 1989, c. 168, s. 23; c. 724, s. 4; 1991, c. 286, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 890, s. 10; c. 1039, s. 9; 2003-284, s. 35.2(a), (b); 2007-495, s. 24;
2010-31, s. 13.8(a); 2010-123, s. 5.1; 2011-145, s. 31.15; 2012-200, s. 21(c); 2014-100, s. 14.24A; 2014-115, s. 10.

§ 130A-295.
Additional requirements for hazardous waste facilities.

An applicant for a permit for a hazardous waste facility shall satisfy the Department that:

Any hazardous waste facility constructed or operated by the applicant, or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the applicant is a corporation, has been operated in accordance, with sound waste management practices and in substantial compliance with
federal and state laws, regulations and rules; and

The applicant, or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the applicant is a corporation, is financially qualified to operate the proposed hazardous waste facility.

An applicant for a permit for a hazardous waste facility shall satisfy the Department that he has met the requirements of subsection (a) of this section before the Department is required to otherwise review the application. In order to continue to hold
a permit under this Chapter, a permittee must remain financially qualified and must provide any information requested by the Department to demonstrate that he continues to be financially qualified.

No permit for any new commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility shall be issued or become effective, and no permit for a commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility shall be modified until the applicant
has satisfied the Department that such facility is needed to meet the current or projected hazardous waste management needs of this State or to comply with the terms of any interstate agreement for the management of hazardous waste
to which the State is a party. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.

At least 120 days prior to submitting an application, an applicant for a permit for a hazardous waste facility shall provide to the county in which the facility is located, to any municipality with planning jurisdiction over the site of the facility,
and to all emergency response agencies that have a role under the contingency plan for the facility all of the following information:

Information on the nature and type of operations to occur at the facility.

Identification of the properties of the hazardous waste to be managed at the facility.

A copy of the draft contingency plan for the facility that includes the proposed role for each local government and each emergency response agency that received information under this subsection.

Information on the hazardous waste locations within the facility.

Within 60 days of receiving the information, each local government and emergency response agency that receives information under subsection (d) of this section shall respond to the applicant in writing as to the adequacy of the contingency plan and the
availability and adequacy of its resources and equipment to respond to an emergency at the facility that results in a release of hazardous waste or hazardous waste constituents into the environment according to the role set forth
for the local government or emergency response agency under the contingency plan.

An applicant for a permit for a hazardous waste facility shall include documentation that each local government and emergency response agency received the information required under subsection (d) of this section, the written responses the applicant received
under subsection (e) of this section, and verification by each that its resources and equipment are available and adequate to respond to an emergency at the facility in accordance with its role as set forth in the contingency plan.
If the applicant does not receive a timely verification from a local government or emergency response agency notified under subsection (d) of this section, the Department shall verify the adequacy of resources and equipment for
emergency response during the course of review of the permit application, taking into account any contracts entered into by the applicant for such emergency response resources.

At each two-year interval after a permit for a hazardous waste facility is issued, the permit holder shall verify that the resources and equipment of each local government and emergency response agency are available and adequate to respond to an emergency
at the facility in accordance with its role as set forth in the contingency plan and shall submit this verification to the Department.

History.
1981, c. 704, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 973, s. 8; 1987, s. 461, s. 3; 1989, c. 168, s. 24; 2007-107, s. 1.2(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-107, s. 1.2(a), effective June 26, 2007, and applicable to applications pending on June 26, 2007, added subsections (d) through (g).

§ 130A-295.01.
Additional requirement for commercial hazardous waste facilities.

As used in this section:

“Commercial hazardous waste facility” means any hazardous waste facility that accepts hazardous waste from the general public or from another person for a fee, but does not include any facility owned or operated by a generator of hazardous waste solely
for his own use, and does not include any facility owned by the State or by any agency or subdivision thereof solely for the management of hazardous waste generated by agencies or subdivisions of the State.

“New”, when used in connection with “facility”, refers to a planned or proposed facility, or a facility that has not been placed in operation, but does not include facilities that have commenced operations as of 22 June 1987, including facilities operated
under interim status.

“Modified”, when used in connection with “permit”, means any change in any permit in force on or after 22 June 1987 that would either expand the scope of permitted operations, or extend the expiration date of the permit, or otherwise constitute a Class
2 or Class 3 modification of the permit as defined in 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 270.41 (1 July 2006).

“7Q10 conditions”, when used in connection with “surface water,” refers to the minimum average flow for a period of seven consecutive days that has an average occurrence of once in 10 years as referenced in 15 NCAC 2B.0206(a)(3) as adopted 1 February
1976.

No permit for any new commercial hazardous waste facility shall be issued or become effective, and no permit for a commercial hazardous waste facility shall be modified, until the applicant has satisfied the Department that such facility meets, in addition
to all other applicable requirements, the following requirements:

The facility shall not discharge directly a hazardous or toxic substance into a surface water that is upstream from a public drinking water supply intake in North Carolina, unless there is a dilution factor of 1000 or greater at the point of discharge
into the surface water under 7Q10 conditions.

The facility shall not discharge indirectly through a publicly owned treatment works (POTW) a hazardous or toxic substance into a surface water that is upstream from a public drinking water supply intake in North Carolina, unless there is a dilution factor
of 1000 or greater, irrespective of any dilution occurring in a wastewater treatment plant, at the point of discharge into the surface water under 7Q10 conditions.

The Department shall not issue a permit for a commercial hazardous waste facility for a period of more than five years. A permit holder for a commercial hazardous waste facility who intends to apply for renewal of the permit shall submit an application
for the renewal of the permit at least one year before the permit expires unless the Department approves a shorter period of time.

The owner or operator of a commercial hazardous waste facility shall maintain a record of information at an off-site location that identifies the generators of the waste and the quantity, type, location, and hazards of the waste at the facility and shall
make this information available in a form and manner to be determined by the Department, accessible to the Department, to the county in which the facility is located, to any municipality with planning jurisdiction over the site
of the facility, and to emergency response agencies that have a role under the contingency plan for the facility.

Within 10 days of filing an application for a permit for a commercial hazardous waste facility, the applicant shall notify every person who resides or owns property located within one-fourth mile of any property boundary of the facility that the application
has been filed. The notice shall be by mail to residents and by certified mail to property owners, or by any other means approved by the Department, shall be in a form approved by the Department, and shall include all of
the following:

The location of the facility.

A description of the facility.

The hazardous and nonhazardous wastes that are to be received and processed at the facility.

A description of the emergency response plan for the facility.

The permit holder for a commercial hazardous waste facility shall publish a notice that includes the information set out in subdivision (1) of this subsection annually beginning one year after the permit is issued. The notice shall be published in a form
and manner approved by the Department in a newspaper of general circulation in the community where the facility is located.

The permit holder for a commercial hazardous waste facility shall provide the information set out in subdivision (1) of this subsection by mail to the persons described in subdivision (1) of this subsection at the midpoint of the period for which the
permit is issued.

Each commercial hazardous waste facility applicant and permit holder shall provide documentation to demonstrate to the Department that the requirements set out in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection have been met.

No later than 31 January of each year, the owner or operator of a commercial hazardous waste facility shall report to the Department any increase or decrease in the number of sensitive land uses and any increase or decrease in estimated population density
based on information provided by the local government that has planning jurisdiction over the site on which the facility is located that occurred during the previous calendar year in the area located within one-fourth mile of any
property boundary of the facility. Changes shall be recorded in the operating record of the facility. As used in this subsection, “sensitive land use” includes residential housing, places of assembly, places of worship, schools,
day care providers, and hospitals. Sensitive land use does not include retail businesses.

The owner or operator of a commercial hazardous waste facility shall provide a security and surveillance system at the facility 24 hours a day, seven days a week in order to continuously monitor site conditions and to control entry. The security and surveillance
system shall be capable of promptly detecting unauthorized access to the facility; monitoring conditions; identifying operator errors; and detecting any discharge that could directly or indirectly cause a fire, explosion, or release
of hazardous waste or hazardous waste constituents into the environment or threaten human health. The requirements of this subsection may be satisfied either by employing trained facility personnel or by providing an electronic
security and surveillance system which may include television, motion detectors, heat-sensing equipment, combustible gas monitors, or any combination of these, as approved by the Department.

The operator of a commercial hazardous waste facility shall install an on-site wind monitor approved by the Department. The wind monitor required shall be located so that the real-time wind direction can be determined from a remote location in the event
of a release of hazardous waste or hazardous waste constituents into the environment.

History.
1987, c. 437, s. 1; 2007-107, ss. 1.3(a), 1.4(a), 1.5(a), 1.6(a), 1.7(a), 1.9(a), 2.1(b); 2007-495, s. 15(a)-(e).

§ 130A-295.02.
Resident inspectors required at commercial hazardous waste facilities; recovery of costs for same.

The Division shall employ full-time resident inspectors for each commercial hazardous waste facility located within the State. Such inspectors shall be employed and assigned so that at least one inspector is on duty at all times during which any component
of the facility is in operation, is undergoing any maintenance or repair, or is undergoing any test or calibration. Resident inspectors shall be assigned to commercial hazardous waste management facilities so as to protect the
public health and the environment, to monitor all aspects of the operation of such facilities, and to assure compliance with all laws and rules administered by the Division and by any other division of the Department. Such inspectors
may also enforce laws or rules administered by any other agency of the State pursuant to an appropriate memorandum of agreement entered into by the Secretary and the chief administrative officer of such agency. The Division may
assign additional resident inspectors to a facility depending upon the quantity and toxicity of waste managed at a facility, diversity of types of waste managed at the facility, complexity of management technologies utilized at
the facility, the range of components which are included at the facility, operating history of the facility, and other factors relative to the need for on-site inspection and enforcement capabilities. The Division, in consultation
with other divisions of the Department, shall define the duties of each resident inspector and shall determine whether additional resident inspectors are needed at a particular facility to meet the purposes of this section.

The Division shall establish requirements pertaining to education, experience, and training for resident inspectors so as to assure that such inspectors are fully qualified to serve the purposes of this section. The Division shall provide its resident
inspectors with such training, equipment, facilities, and supplies as may be necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section.

As a condition of its permit, the owner or operator of each commercial hazardous waste facility located within the State shall provide and maintain such appropriate and secure offices and laboratory facilities as the Department may require for the use
of the resident inspectors required by this section.

Resident inspectors assigned to a commercial hazardous waste facility shall have unrestricted access to all operational areas of such facility at all times. For the protection of resident inspectors and the public, the provisions of G.S. 143-215.107(f)
shall not apply to commercial hazardous waste facilities to which a resident inspector is assigned.

No commercial hazardous waste facility shall be operated, undergo any maintenance or repair, or undergo any testing or calibration unless an inspector employed by the Division is present at the facility.

The requirements of this section are intended to enhance the ability of the Department to protect the public health and the environment by providing the Department with the authority and resources necessary to maintain a rigorous inspection and enforcement
program at commercial hazardous waste management facilities. The requirements of this section are intended to be supplementary to other requirements imposed on hazardous waste facilities. This section shall not be construed to
relieve either the owner or the operator of any such facility or the Department from any other requirement of law or to require any unnecessary duplication of reporting or monitoring requirements.

For the purpose of enforcing the laws and rules enacted or adopted for the protection of the public health and the environment, resident inspectors employed pursuant to this section may be commissioned as special peace officers as provided in

G.S. 113-28.1

. The provisions of Article 1A of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes shall apply to resident inspectors commissioned as special peace officers pursuant to this subsection.

The Department shall determine the full cost of the employment and assignment of resident inspectors at each commercial hazardous waste facility located within the State. Such costs shall include, but are not limited to, costs incurred for salaries, benefits,
travel, training, equipment, supplies, telecommunication and data transmission, offices and other facilities other than those provided by the owner or operator, and administrative expenses. The Department shall establish and revise
as necessary a schedule of fees to be assessed on the users of each such facility to recover the actual cost of the resident inspector program at that facility. The operator of each such facility shall serve as the collection agent
for such fees, shall account to the Department on a monthly basis for all fees collected, and shall deposit with the Department all funds collected pursuant to this section within 15 days following the last day of the month in
which such fees are collected. Fees collected under this section shall be credited to the General Fund as nontax revenue.

The Division shall establish and revise as necessary a program for assigning resident inspectors to commercial hazardous waste facilities so that scheduled rotation or equivalent oversight procedures ensure that each resident inspector will maintain objectivity.

For purposes of this subsection, special purpose commercial hazardous waste facilities include: a facility that manages limited quantities of hazardous waste; a facility that limits its hazardous waste management activities to reclamation or recycling,
including energy or materials recovery or a facility that stores hazardous waste primarily for use at such facilities; or a facility that is determined to be low risk under rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this subsection.
The Commission shall adopt rules to determine whether a commercial hazardous waste facility is a special purpose commercial hazardous waste facility and to establish classifications of special purpose commercial hazardous waste
facilities. The rules to determine whether a commercial hazardous waste facility is a special purpose commercial hazardous waste facility and to establish classifications of special purpose commercial hazardous waste facilities
shall be based on factors including, but not limited to, the size of the facility, the type of treatment or storage being performed, the nature and volume of waste being treated or stored, the uniformity, similarity, or lack of
diversity of the waste streams, the predictability of the nature of the waste streams and their treatability, whether the facility utilizes automated monitoring or safety devices that adequately perform functions that would otherwise
be performed by a resident inspector, the fact that reclamation or recycling is being performed at the facility, and the compliance history of the facility and its operator. Based on the foregoing factors and any increase or decrease
in the number of sensitive land uses over time or in estimated population density over time reported pursuant to G.S. 130A-295.01(f), rules adopted pursuant to this subsection shall establish times and frequencies for the presence
of a resident inspector on less than a full-time basis at special purpose commercial hazardous waste facilities and specify a minimum number of additional inspections at special purpose hazardous waste facilities.Special purpose
commercial hazardous waste facilities that utilize hazardous waste as a fuel source shall be inspected a minimum of 40 hours per week, unless compliance data for these facilities can be electronically monitored and recorded off-site
by the Department. The Department, considering the benefits provided by electronic monitoring, shall determine the number of hours of on-site inspection required at these facilities. The Department shall maintain records of all
inspections at special purpose commercial hazardous waste facilities. Such records shall contain sufficient detail and shall be arranged in a readily understandable format so as to facilitate determination at any time as to whether
the special purpose commercial hazardous waste facility is in compliance with the requirements of this subsection and of rules adopted pursuant to this subsection. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, special purpose
commercial hazardous waste facilities shall be subject to inspection at all times during which the facility is in operation, undergoing any maintenance or repair, or undergoing any test or calibration.

For purposes of this section, a facility that utilizes hazardous waste as a fuel or that has used hazardous waste as a fuel within the preceding calendar year, and that is an affiliate of and adjacent or contiguous to a commercial hazardous waste facility,
shall be subject to inspection as a special purpose commercial hazardous waste facility under subsection (j) of this section as if the facility that utilizes hazardous waste as a fuel were a part of the commercial hazardous waste
facility.

As used in this section, the words “affiliate”, “parent”, and “subsidiary” have the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1990 Edition).

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(d), effective August 1, 2012.

History.
1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1082, s. 1; 1991, c. 20, s. 2; c. 403, s. 4; c. 450, s. 2; 1993, c. 511, s. 1; c. 513, s. 2(b); c. 553, s. 41; 1995, c. 327, s. 1; 2006-79, s. 16; 2007-107, s. 1.5(b); 2009-570, s. 16; 2012-200,
s. 21(d).

§ 130A-295.03.
Additional requirement for hazardous waste disposal facilities; hazardous waste to be placed in containers.

For purposes of this section, the term “container” means any portable device into which waste is placed for storage, transportation, treatment, disposal, or other handling, and includes the first enclosure which encompasses the waste.

All hazardous waste shall be placed in containers for disposal, except as the Commission shall provide for by rule. The Commission shall adopt standards for the design and construction of containers for disposal. Standards for containers may vary for
different types of waste. The standards for disposal containers may supplement or duplicate any of the performance or engineering standards for hazardous waste disposal facilities required under State or federal law; however,
the performance or engineering standards for hazardous waste disposal facilities are separate and cumulative, and the performance or engineering standards for hazardous waste disposal facilities and containers may not substitute
for or replace one another.

History.
1991, c. 450, s. 1; c. 761, s. 22.

§ 130A-295.04.
Financial responsibility requirements for applicants for a permit and permit holders for hazardous waste facilities.

In addition to any other financial responsibility requirements for solid waste management facilities under this Part, the applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a hazardous waste facility shall establish financial assurance that will ensure that
sufficient funds are available for facility closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, any corrective action that the Department may require, and to satisfy any potential liability for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences,
and subsequent costs incurred by the Department in response to an incident at a facility, even if the applicant or permit holder becomes insolvent or ceases to reside, be incorporated, do business, or maintain assets in the State.

To establish sufficient availability of funds under this section, the applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a hazardous waste facility may use insurance, financial tests, third-party guarantees by persons who can pass the financial test, guarantees
by corporate parents who can pass the financial test, irrevocable letters of credit, trusts, surety bonds, or any other financial device, or any combination of the foregoing, shown to provide protection equivalent to the financial
protection that would be provided by insurance if insurance were the only mechanism used.

The applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a hazardous waste facility, and any parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant, permit holder, or parent, including any joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant,
permit holder, or parent, shall be a guarantor of payment for closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, any corrective action that the Department may require, and to satisfy any potential liability for sudden and nonsudden
accidental occurrences arising from the operation of the hazardous waste facility.

, (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-394, s. 23(a), effective July 1, 2011.

(f)
Assets used to meet the financial assurance requirements of this section shall be in a form that will allow the Department to readily access funds for the purposes set out in this section. Assets used to meet financial
assurance requirements of this section shall not be accessible to the permit holder except as approved by the Department. Compliance with the financial assurance requirements set forth in Subpart H of Part 264 of 40 Code of
Federal Regulations (July 1, 2010 edition) shall be sufficient to meet the requirements of this subsection.

(g)
The Department may provide a copy of any filing that an applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a hazardous waste facility submits to the Department to meet the financial responsibility requirements under
this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall review the filing and provide the Department with a written opinion as to the adequacy of the filing to meet the purposes of this section, including any recommended
changes.

(h)
In order to continue to hold a permit for a hazardous waste facility, a permit holder must maintain financial responsibility as required by this Part and must provide any information requested by the Department
to establish that the permit holder continues to maintain financial responsibility.

(i)
An applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a hazardous waste facility shall satisfy the Department that the applicant or permit holder has met the financial responsibility requirements of this Part before
the Department is required to otherwise review the application.

(j)
Repealed by Session Laws 2011-394, s. 23(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.
2007-107, s. 1.1(a); 2011-394, s. 23(a).

§ 130A-295.05.
Hazardous waste transfer facilities.

The owner or operator of a hazardous waste transfer facility in North Carolina shall register the facility with the Department and shall obtain a hazardous waste transfer facility identification number for the facility. In order to obtain a hazardous
waste transfer facility identification number for the facility, the owner or operator of the facility shall provide all of the following information to the Department at the time of registration:

The location of the hazardous waste transfer facility.

The name of the owner of the property on which the hazardous waste transfer facility is located.

Except during transportation emergencies as determined by the Department, the temporary storage, consolidation, or commingling of hazardous waste may occur only at a hazardous waste transfer facility that has been issued a facility identification number
by the Department.

A hazardous waste transporter and the owner or operator of a hazardous waste transfer facility shall conduct all operations at any hazardous waste transfer facility in compliance with the requirements of 40 Code of Federal Regulations Part 263 (1 July
2006), 49 U.S.C. § 5101, et seq., and any laws, regulations, or rules enacted or adopted pursuant to these federal laws. Except as preempted under 49 U.S.C. § 5125, a hazardous waste transporter and the owner or operator of a hazardous
waste transfer facility shall also conduct all operations at any hazardous waste transfer facility in compliance with all applicable State laws or rules.

A hazardous waste transporter shall notify the Department, on a form prescribed by the Department, of every hazardous waste transfer facility in North Carolina that the transporter uses. A hazardous waste transporter shall retain all records that are
required to be maintained for at least three years.

The owner or operator of a hazardous waste transfer facility shall notify the Department, on a form prescribed by the Department, of every hazardous waste transporter that makes use of the facility. The owner or operator of a hazardous waste transfer
facility shall retain all records that are required to be maintained for at least three years.

History.
2007-107, s. 1.8(c).

§ 130A-295.1.
(See Editor’s note) Limitations on permits for sanitary landfills.